Washington statutes.
RCW 36.22.150

Duty of retiring auditor or his or her representative in case of death.

Each auditor, on retiring from office, shall deliver to his or her successor the seal of office and all the books, records, and instruments of writing belonging to the office, and take his or her receipt therefor. In case of the death of the auditor, his or her legal representatives shall deliver over the seal, books, records and papers.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4027; 1963 c 4 s 36.22.150. Prior: Code 1881 s 2725; 1869 p 314 s 22; RRS s 4104.]